src/morphology/stems/suffixes.lexc
-muistinen%+A:muisti    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-muistisuus%+N:muistisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-muistoinen%+A:muistoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-mukulainen%+A:mukulai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-munainen%+A:munai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-murteinen%+A:murtei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-myötäisyys%+N:myötäisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-naamainen%+A:naamai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-nahkaisuus%+N:nahkaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-napainen%+A:napai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-nappinen%+A:nappi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-nenäinen%+A:nenäi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-neuleinen%+A:neulei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-neuvoinen%+A:neuvoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-nidoksinen%+A:nidoksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-niekka%+N:niek NOUN_POLITIIKKA    ;
-nieluinen%+A:nielui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-niitinen%+A:niiti  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-nilkkainen%+A:nilkkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-niskainen%+A:niskai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-nivelinen%+A:niveli    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-nokkainen%+A:nokkai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-nopeuksinen%+A:nopeuksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-nousuinen%+A:nousui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-nurkkainen%+A:nurkkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-näkemyksinen%+A:näkemyksi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-näyttöinen%+A:näyttöi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-näytöksinen%+A:näytöksi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-ohimoinen%+A:ohimoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ohjauksinen%+A:ohjauksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ohjelmainen%+A:ohjelmai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-oktaaninen%+A:oktaani  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-olkaiminen%+A:olkaimi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-olkainen%+A:olkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-omainen%+A:omai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-omaisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:omaisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-omaisuus%+N:omaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-omisteinen%+A:omistei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ompeleinen%+A:ompelei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-onninen%+A:onni    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-opettajainen%+A:opettajai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-oppinen%+N:oppi    NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-oppisuus%+N:oppisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-osainen%+N:osai    NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-osaisuus%+N:osaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-osastoinen%+N:osastoi  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-otsainen%+A:otsai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-otteinen%+A:ottei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ovinen%+A:ovi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-paikkainen%+A:paikkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-paikkalainen%+A:paikkalai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-painoisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:painoisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-painoisuus%+N:painoisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-painotteinen%+A:painottei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-painotteisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:painotteisesti PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-painotteisuus%+N:painotteisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-paitainen%+A:paitai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-pakoinen%+A:pakoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-palkkainen%+A:palkkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-palkkaisuus%+N:palkkaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-palmikkoinen%+A:palmikkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-palstainen%+A:palstai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-paniaiset%+N:paniai    NOUN_RAPPUSET  ;
-panija%+N:panij    NOUN_MAKKARA   ;
-parinen%+A:pari    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-peltoinen%+A:peltoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-penninen%+A:penni  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-perheinen%+A:perhei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-periaatteinen%+A:periaattei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-persoonainen%+A:persoonai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-perustainen%+A:perustai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-perusteinen%+A:perustei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-peräinen%+A:peräi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-peräisyys%+N:peräisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-pigmenttinen%+A:pigmentti  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-piippuinen%+A:piippui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-piirteinen%+A:piirtei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-pilttuinen%+A:pilttui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-pinnoitteinen%+A:pinnoittei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-pintainen%+A:pintai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-pintaisuus%+N:pintaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-pitoinen%+A:pitoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-pohjainen%+A:pohjai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-pohjaisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:pohjaisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-pohjaisuus%+N:pohjaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-pohkeinen%+A:pohkei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-polvinen%+A:polvi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-portainen%+A:portai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-poskinen%+A:poski  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-potkuinen%+A:potkui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-potkurinen%+A:potkuri  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-povinen%+A:povi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-puheinen%+A:puhei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-puitteinen%+A:puittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-pukuinen%+A:pukui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-punontainen%+A:punontai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-puolainen%+A:puolai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-puoleisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:puoleisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-puolueinen%+A:puoluei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-purjeinen%+A:purjei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-puseroinen%+A:puseroi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-putkinen%+A:putki  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-pylväinen%+A:pylväi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-pyrstöinen%+A:pyrstöi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-pyöräinen%+A:pyöräi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-päinen%+A:päi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-päiväinen%+A:päiväi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-päällyksinen%+A:päällyksi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-päällysteinen%+A:päällystei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-päärmeinen%+A:päärmei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-pääsyinen%+A:pääsyi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-päätteinen%+A:päättei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-pöksyinen%+A:pöksyi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-pölytteinen%+A:pölyttei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-raajainen%+A:raajai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-rahoitteinen%+A:rahoittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-raiteinen%+A:raitei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-rajainen%+A:rajai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-rajoitteinen%+A:rajoittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-rantainen%+A:rantai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ratainen%+A:ratai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ravinteinen%+A:ravintei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ravintoinen%+A:ravintoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-reitinen%+A:reiti  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-renkainen%+A:renkai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-reunainen%+A:reunai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-reunuksinen%+A:reunuksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-rintainen%+A:rintai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-rinteinen%+A:rintei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-rivinen%+A:rivi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-runkoinen%+A:runkoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ruokainen%+A:ruokai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ruokaisuus%+N:ruokaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-ruumiinen%+A:ruumii    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ryhtinen%+A:ryhti  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-räystäinen%+A:räystäi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-sanaisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:sanaisesti PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-sanaisuus%+N:sanaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-sankainen%+N:sankai    NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-sarjainen%+A:sarjai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sarjalainen%+A:sarjalai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sarvinen%+A:sarvi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-satainen%+A:satai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-seinäinen%+A:seinäi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-sekoitteinen%+A:sekoittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sekuntinen%+A:sekunti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-selitteinen%+A:selittei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-selkoinen%+A:selkoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-selkäinen%+A:selkäi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-selkäisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:selkäisesti   PCLE_TYHMÄSTI   ;
-selkäisyys%+N:selkäisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-selustainen%+A:selustai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-senttinen%+A:sentti    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-seosteinen%+A:seostei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sidoksinen%+A:sidoksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sieluinen%+N:sielui    NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-sieluisuus%+N:sieluisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-siemeninen%+A:siemeni  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-sieraiminen%+A:sieraimi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sietoinen%+A:sietoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-siipinen%+A:siipi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-siirtoinen%+A:siirtoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-siittoinen%+A:siittoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sijoitteinen%+A:sijoittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-silavainen%+A:silavai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-silmukkainen%+A:silmukkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-silmäinen%+A:silmäi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-silmäisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:silmäisesti   PCLE_TYHMÄSTI   ;
-silmäisyys%+N:silmäisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-sirkkainen%+A:sirkkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sisuinen%+A:sisui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sisustainen%+A:sisustai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sisusteinen%+A:sisustei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-siteinen%+A:sitei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-sivelteinen%+A:siveltei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-sivuinen%+A:sivui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-solkinen%+A:solki  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-soluinen%+A:solui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-somisteinen%+A:somistei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-soppinen%+A:soppi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sorminen%+A:sormi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-soutuinen%+A:soutui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sovitteinen%+A:sovittei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-suhtainen%+A:suhtai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-suhtaisuus%+N:suhtaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-suhteinen%+A:suhtei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-suinen%+A:sui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sukainen%+A:sukai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sukuisuus%+N:sukuisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-sulatteinen%+A:sulattei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-sulkainen%+A:sulkai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-summainen%+A:summai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-suojattu%+A:suojat ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
-sydäminen%+A:sydämi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-sydämisyys%+N:sydämisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-sykkeinen%+A:sykkei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-sykkeisyys%+N:sykkeisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-sylinterinen%+A:sylinteri  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-syntyinen%+A:syntyi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-syntyisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:syntyisesti   PCLE_TYHMÄSTI   ;
-syntyisyys%+N:syntyisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-sytytteinen%+A:sytyttei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-sytytyksinen%+A:sytytyksi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-syöttöinen%+A:syöttöi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-säesteinen%+A:säestei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-säestyksinen%+A:säestyksi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-säkeinen%+A:säkei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-säkeistöinen%+A:säkeistöi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-sälpä%+N:säl   NOUN_LEIPÄ ;
-särmäinen%+A:särmäi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-säteinen%+A:sätei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-sävytteinen%+A:sävyttei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-säädäntö%+N:säädän NOUN_KÄÄNTÖ    ;
-säärinen%+A:sääri  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-säärisyys%+N:säärisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-sääteinen%+A:säätei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-säätyinen%+A:säätyi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-säätöinen%+A:säätöi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-säätöisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:säätöisesti   PCLE_TYHMÄSTI   ;
-tahkoinen%+A:tahkoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tahoinen%+A:tahoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tahtinen%+A:tahti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tahtoinen%+A:tahtoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tahtoisuus%+N:tahtoisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-taipeinen%+A:taipei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-taittoinen%+A:taittoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-taittoisuus%+N:taittoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-takkinen%+A:takki  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tapahtumainen%+A:tapahtumai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tapauksinen%+A:tapauksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tarmoinen%+A:tarmoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tarpeinen%+A:tarpei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tavuinen%+A:tavui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tehoisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:tehoisesti PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-teinen%+A:tei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-tekijäinen%+A:tekijäi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-tekiäiset%+N:tekiäi    NOUN_VIHKIÄISET    ;
-tekoinen%+A:tekoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tekoisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:tekoisesti PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-tekoisuus%+N:tekoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-tekstinen%+A:teksti    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-tempoinen%+A:tempoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-teriöinen%+A:teriöi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-teräinen%+A:teräi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-tieteinen%+A:tietei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-tiivisteinen%+A:tiivistei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-toiminen%+A:toimi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-toimintainen%+A:toimintai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tolkulla%+Pcle%+Adv:tolkulla   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-tolkulla%+Pcle:tolkulla    PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-tonninen%+A:tonni  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-torninen%+A:torni  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tukkainen%+A:tukkai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tulkintainen%+A:tulkintai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tulkintaisuus%+N:tulkintaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-tuloinen%+A:tuloi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tuloksinen%+A:tuloksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tumainen%+A:tumai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tunnelmainen%+A:tunnelmai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tunteinen%+A:tuntei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tunteisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:tunteisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-tunteisuus%+N:tunteisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-tuntinen%+A:tunti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tuntoinen%+A:tuntoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
